Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.130

Training in evaluation procedures required.

(1) No administrator, principal, or other supervisory personnel may evaluate a teacher without having received training in evaluation procedures.

(2) Before evaluating classroom teachers using the evaluation systems required under RCW 28A.405.100, principals and administrators must engage in professional development designed to implement the revised systems and maximize rater agreement.

[ 2012 c 35 s 3; 1985 c 420 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.67.215.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1985 c 420 s 4: "Section 4 of this act shall take effect September 1, 1986." [ 1985 c 420 s 10.]

Contingency—Effective date—Severability—1985 c 420: See notes following RCW 28A.405.110.